Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1272
Operation of vessel in violation of law; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of section 37-1254 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor for each such violation.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 72.